Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2515.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 37, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 37-292, to read: START_STATUTE37-292. Groundwater withdrawal fee; agricultural land; annual report; fee deposits; definitions A. The department shall establish by rule and collect an annual groundwater withdrawal fee from each lessee of state land that is agricultural land and that is located outside of an active management area or an irrigation non-expansion area for the irrigation use of groundwater. B. On or before March 31 of each year, a lessee of state land that is agricultural land and that is located outside of an active management area or an irrigation non-expansion area shall report the following information to the department regarding the irrigation use of groundwater on that lessee's state land: 1. The location of the well. 2. The quantity of groundwater withdrawn from the well during the previous calendar year. 3. The specific uses to which the groundwater was applied during the previous calendar year. C. Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the fund of the appropriate beneficiary. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Active management area" has the same meaning prescribed in section 45-402. 2. "Irrigation non-expansion area" has the same meaning prescribed in section 45-402. 3. "Irrigation use" has the same meaning prescribed in section 45-402, paragraph 23, subdivision (a). END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Legislative intent The legislature intends that it is in the best interest of the state land trust for the annual groundwater withdrawal fee adopted pursuant to section 37-292, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, to reflect the fair market value of the groundwater withdrawn.